Maine, session 132, LD987.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§4, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 630, §1, is amended
to read:
I. A motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment regulated under a federal motor vehicle
safety standard, as defined in 49 United States Code, Section 30102(a)(10), and any
other motor vehicle, including an off-highway vehicle or specialty motor vehicle, such
as an all-terrain vehicle, a side-by-side vehicle, construction, forestry or farm
equipment or a personal assistive mobility device, except that the exemption under this
paragraph does not apply to any textile article or refrigerant that is included in or as a
component part of such products;
Page 1 - 132LR1759(03)